Hawaii statutes.
[§94-8] State archives preservation
and long-term access special fund; state archives preservation fee. (a)
There shall be established in the state treasury the state archives
preservation and long-term access special fund for the preservation of and long-term
access to government records.

(b) All revenues collected from fees for
services provided by the state archives shall be deposited in the state
archives preservation and long-term access special fund and be expended by the
comptroller to carry out the purposes of this section, including funding for
staff positions and for administrative and operational costs of the program.
All interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited in the fund shall become
part of the fund.

(c) In addition to any other fee authorized by
law, a state archives preservation fee of $1 shall be assessed for each
document that is filed or registered by members of the public with a
governmental entity and listed on an authorized records retention and
disposition schedule as permanent. The preservation fee shall be collected and
deposited in the state archives preservation and long-term access special fund
and used to preserve and keep accessible electronic records of such documents
in a usable state for the good of the public. [L 2013, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next